Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF372.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 97B.001, subdivision 7, is amended to read: Subd. 7. Using firearms and taking in certain areas. (a) Unless otherwise provided by law, a person may not discharge a firearm within 500 feet of a building occupied by a human or livestock without the written permission of the owner, occupant, or lessee: (1) on another person's private land, if the land is not a licensed shooting preserve; or (2) on a public road right-of-way. (b) No person may discharge a firearm within 500 feet of a stockade or corral confining livestock for the purpose of normal livestock holding or sorting operations without the permission of the owner, occupant, or lessee. This paragraph does not apply to persons hunting during an established hunting season on state-owned or local government-owned land that is not a road right-of-way. new text begin This paragraph does not apply to a person discharging a firearm on land that is owned by the person or by an immediate family member of the person. new text end For the purposes of this paragraph, a "stockade or corral" means a fenced enclosure for confining livestock that does not enclose an area greater than one acre. (c) A person may not take a wild animal on any land where the person is prohibited from entering by this section.